Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1757.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [624.7139] LOST OR STOLEN FIREARMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Duty to report. new text end new text begin A person who owns, possesses, or controls a firearm must report the loss or theft of the firearm to a law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the loss or theft occurred as soon as practicable but not later than within 48 hours of the time the person knew or reasonably should have known of the loss or theft. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalty. new text end new text begin (a) A person who violates this section is guilty of a petty misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates this section a second time is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) A person who violates this section a third or subsequent time is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Immunity. new text end new text begin A person who reports a lost or stolen firearm in compliance with the requirements of subdivision 1 is immune from criminal prosecution for an offense pursuant to state law related to the storage of firearms. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report to commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin A chief of police or sheriff shall report a lost or stolen firearm to the commissioner of public safety within seven days of receiving notification of the loss or theft under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to acts committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $36,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for a reporting system overseen by the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension to allow chiefs of police and sheriffs to report lost or stolen firearms. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end